Florida, session 2026, SB2.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 49 50 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 51 found and declared to be true. 52 Section 2.âThe sum of $1.75 million is appropriated from 53 the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Highway Safety and 54 Motor Vehicles for the relief of the Estate of Danielle Maudsley 55 for damages sustained as a result of the injuries to Danielle 56 Maudsley and her subsequent death. 57 Section 3.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 58 a warrant payable to the Estate of Danielle Maudsley in the sum 59 of $1.75 million, minus amounts required to satisfy outstanding 60 Medicaid liens relating to the medical expenses and care of 61 Danielle Maudsley, upon funds of the Department of Highway 62 Safety and Motor Vehicles in the State Treasury and to pay the 63 same out of such funds. 64 Section 4.âThe amount paid by the Division of Risk 65 Management of the Department of Financial Services in accordance 66 with the statutory limits of liability set forth in s. 768.28, 67 Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under this act are 68 intended to provide the sole compensation for all present and 69 future claims arising out of the factual situation described in 70 this act which resulted in the death of Danielle Maudsley. The 71 total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this claim may 72 not exceed 25 percent of the amount awarded under this act. 73 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.